Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1989
Liability for unlawful distributions.

(a) Unless a director complies with the applicable standards of conduct described in section 21-1986, a director who votes for or assents to a distribution made in violation of the Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act is personally liable to the corporation for the amount of the distribution that exceeds what could have been distributed without violating the act.

(b) A director held liable for an unlawful distribution under subsection (a) of this section is entitled to contribution:

(1) From every other director who voted for or assented to the distribution without complying with the applicable standards of conduct described in section 21-1986; and

(2) From each person who received an unlawful distribution for the amount of the distribution whether or not the person receiving the distribution knew it was made in violation of the act.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 89.